Wyoming, session 2026, HB0090.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Consumptive water use" includes
electrolysis, plasma dissociation, thermochemical
splitting, the chemical dissociation of water into its
elemental components or the use of water as a feedstock in
HB0090

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0297
the production of hydrogen fuel or other chemical
compounds;

(ii) "Hydrological cycle" means the natural
process by which water circulates between the earth's
surface, atmosphere and subsurface, including evaporation,
condensation, precipitation, runoff, infiltration and
groundwater recharge.

(b) The state engineer shall conduct a study of the
potential impacts on the state of Wyoming and water users
in Wyoming from current and future consumptive water uses
that remove water from the hydrological cycle as provided
in this section as well as the potential impacts from large
scale industrial water use.

(c) The study required by this section shall focus
on:

(i) Large scale industrial water use by data
centers or other large scale industrial water uses
including carbon capture technologies. This paragraph shall
not include uses that result in normal evaporation losses
HB0090

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0297
incidental to irrigation, reservoir operation, domestic use
or industrial cooling other than large scale industrial
cooling that may prevent the return of water to the
hydrological cycle;

(ii) The use of water for hydrogen production;

(iii) Other consumptive water uses that prevent
the return of water to the hydrological cycle.

(d) The study required by this section shall include
at a minimum:

(i) An analysis of any current large scale
industrial or consumptive water use occurring in Wyoming
and the impact of that use on other water users;

(ii) Recommendations on how to limit the impact
of current and future large scale industrial and
consumptive water use on existing and future water users in
Wyoming for all beneficial uses, including but not limited
to municipal, domestic, agricultural, industrial, instream
flows, hydroelectric power and recreational purposes.
HB0090

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0297

(e) The results of the study required under this
section along with any recommendations for legislation
shall be reported to the joint agriculture, state and
public lands and water resources interim committee not
later than November 1, 2026.

(f) There is appropriated five hundred thousand
dollars ($500,000.00) from the general fund to the state
engineer's office for the purpose of conducting the study
required under this section. This appropriation shall be
for the period beginning with the effective date of this
act and ending June 30, 2027. This appropriation shall not
be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any
unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this
appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30,
2027. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the state engineer's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

HB0090

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0297
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
HB0090